Hawaii statutes.
§196-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Commission" means the public
utilities commission.

"Coordinator" means the energy
resources coordinator.

"Distributor" means:

(1) Every person who refines, manufactures, produces,
or compounds fuel in the State and sells it at wholesale or retail, or who uses
it directly in the manufacture of products or for the generation of power;

(2) Every person who imports or causes to be imported
into the State, or exports or causes to be exported from the State, any fuel;

(3) Every person who acquires fuel through exchanges
with another distributor; and

(4) Every person who purchases fuel for resale at
wholesale or retail rates from any person described in paragraph (1), (2), or
(3).

"Electricity" means all electrical
energy produced by combustion of any fuel, or generated or produced using wind,
the sun, geothermal heat, ocean water, falling water, currents, and waves, or
any other source.

"Energy" means work or heat that is,
or may be, produced from any fuel or source whatsoever.

"Energy resources" means fuel, and
also includes all electrical or thermal energy produced by combustion of any
fuel, or generated or produced using wind, the sun, geothermal heat, ocean
water, falling water, currents, waves, or any other source.

"Fuel" means fuels, whether liquid,
solid, or gaseous, commercially usable for energy needs, power generation, and
fuels manufacture, that may be manufactured, grown, produced, or imported into
the State or that may be exported therefrom, including petroleum and petroleum
products and gases to include all fossil fuel-based gases, coal tar, vegetable
ferments, biomass, municipal solid waste, biofuels, hydrogen, agricultural
products used as fuels and as feedstock to produce fuels, and all fuel
alcohols.

"Townhouse" means a series of
individual houses, having architectural unity and a common wall between each
unit. [L 1974, c 237, §2; am L 1993, c 15, §1; am L 2009, c 153, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next